District of Columbia statutes.
34-1911.07

Right to alter, amend, or repeal reserved.

Congress reserves the right to alter, amend, or repeal this subchapter.

History

June 20, 1902, 32 Stat. 395, ch. 1136, § 7

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1408.
1973 Ed., § 43-1408.